Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 1 General Provisions
11-14-115. Violations — Penalties.

Whoever violates, fails, neglects or refuses to obey this part or rule or regulation promulgated hereunder may be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of such violation.

In addition to the foregoing criminal penalty, the general assembly finds that it is appropriate that there be the following civil sanction as well. Any person who commits any of the following acts or omissions is subject to a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day for each day during which the act or omission continues or occurs:

Any damage or vandalism to any natural area;

The removal or destruction of any rare, threatened or endangered species of plants in any natural area; or

Any other violation of this part or the rules promulgated hereunder.

The commissioner, through the attorney general and reporter, may institute proceedings for assessment in the chancery court of Davidson County or in the chancery court of the county in which all or part of the violation occurred, in the name of the department.

In assessing the civil penalty, the court may consider the following factors:

Whether the civil penalty imposed will be a substantial economic deterrent to the illegal activity;

Damages to the natural area, including compensation for loss or destruction of any part of the area, resulting from the violation, as well as expenses involved in enforcing this section and the costs involved in rectifying any damage;

The cause of the violation; and

Any economic benefit gained by the violator.

Acts 1971, ch. 116, § 15; T.C.A., § 11-1715; Acts 1998, ch. 1080, § 6; 2001, ch. 56, § 7.

11-14-116. Reelfoot Lake natural area — Administration — Land acquisition.

Notwithstanding any of this part to the contrary, this section is applicable to the Reelfoot Lake natural area, an area designated as a natural area under § 11-14-108 and described therein.

The responsibility for the administration of the Reelfoot Lake natural area under this part is transferred from the department, in cooperation with the wildlife resources agency acting as an advisory body, to the wildlife resources agency, in cooperation with the department acting as an advisory body.

All powers and duties of the commissioner under this part, with respect to the Reelfoot Lake natural area, are transferred to and shall be exercised and performed by the executive director of the wildlife resources agency, except that the power and duty to promulgate regulations are transferred to and shall be exercised by the fish and wildlife commission.

All powers and duties of the department under this part, with respect to the Reelfoot Lake natural area, are transferred to and shall be exercised by the wildlife resources agency.

The fish and wildlife commission, when promulgating regulations applicable to the Reelfoot Lake natural area, and the wildlife resources agency and its executive director, in the administration of the Reelfoot Lake natural area, shall seek the cooperation and advice of the department during the preparation of such regulations and the development of all management plans and policies for the natural area.

The powers and duties of the fish and wildlife commission, the wildlife resources agency and its executive director, with respect to the Reelfoot Lake natural area under this section shall not extend to those properties operated by the division of parks and recreation, as the Reelfoot Lake State Resort Park, including noncontiguous day use areas, and consisting of approximately two hundred seventy-nine and twenty-three hundredths (279.23) acres.

No provision of this part shall prevent the fish and wildlife commission from allowing hunting, fishing or other taking of wildlife on the Reelfoot Lake natural area in accordance with title 70 and the rules, regulations and proclamations promulgated pursuant to title 70. However, such rules, regulations and proclamations may include restrictions on hunting, fishing or other taking of wildlife in limited areas designated by the fish and wildlife commission as requiring such restrictions for the protection of plant and animal species which are listed by either the department or the fish and wildlife commission as endangered, threatened, deemed in need of management or of special concern.

Annually, not later than January 8, the executive director of the wildlife resources agency shall submit a report to the appropriate standing committees of the senate and the house of representatives of the general assembly. Such report shall outline, in summary form, the agency's activities and accomplishments in administering the Reelfoot Lake natural area during the preceding fiscal year.

The general assembly finds and declares that it is in the general interests of the people of Tennessee to establish a partnership between this state and private, nonprofit corporations, qualifying under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), for the purpose of implementing the expeditious acquisition of interest in lands at Reelfoot Lake.

The executive director of the wildlife resources agency shall identify appropriate private, nonprofit corporations to assist with the acquisition of these lands. These corporations shall have the protection of charters of incorporation. The executive director is authorized, with the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration and the state building commission, to enter into agreements with such corporations to permit the corporations to purchase surveys, appraisals, title work, and other services required for the acquisition of interests in lands at Reelfoot Lake; provided, that contractors selected by the corporations for these purposes must be properly licensed in Tennessee for these purposes. The executive director, with the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration and the state building commission, is further authorized to accept such surveys, appraisals, title work, and services on behalf of the state and to enter into agreements with such corporations to acquire options and to preacquire on behalf of the state interests in lands at Reelfoot Lake. The executive director is further authorized, with the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration and the state building commission, to acquire conservation easements from such corporations where such corporations may retain the fee title; provided, that the executive director may not purchase a conservation easement under such circumstances for more than its appraised value. The executive director may, through such agreements, commit the state to reimburse the corporations for their costs of acquisition and for their costs of capital. The commissioner of finance and administration and the state building commission shall establish a form for such agreements.

Acts 1984, ch. 548, § 1; 1985, ch. 350, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 993, § 4; 2013, ch. 93, § 3.

Cross-References. Additional statements of administration of Reelfoot Lake natural area, §§ 70-1-206, 70-1-302, 70-1-305, 70-5-107.

Reelfoot Lake land acquisition, §§ 70-1-302, 70-2-219, 70-5-102.

Reelfoot Lake water level and ordinary high water mark, § 70-5-107.

Attorney General Opinions. Regulation of Reelfoot Lake waterfowl blinds by wildlife agencies, OAG 98-007, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (1/9/98).

Regulation of waterfowl blinds on Reelfoot Lake, OAG 97-152, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 195 (11/05/97).

11-14-117. Initiation of proceedings — Injunctive relief.

The commissioner may initiate proceedings in the chancery court of Davidson County or the county in which the activities occurred against any person who is alleged to have violated or is about to violate this part or the rules promulgated hereunder. In such action the commissioner may seek, and the court may grant, injunctive relief and any other relief available in law or equity.

Acts 2001, ch. 56, § 8.